Utah statutes.
17B-1-616.   Property tax levy -- Amount in budget as basis for determining.

From the effective date of the budget or of any amendment enacted prior to the date on which property taxes are levied, the amount stated as the amount of estimated revenue from property taxes shall constitute the basis for determining the property tax levy to be set by the board of trustees for the corresponding tax year, subject to the applicable limitations imposed by law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

